Mississippi, session 2026, HB4165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Brandon Shelton of Lee County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Burglary-Nonresidential in Lafayette County, on January 3, 2018, for which he was sentenced to serve five (5) years under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He violated probation and probation was revoked.  As a result of such revocation, on October 21, 2019, he was sentenced to serve five (5) years on House Arrest under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released on January 19, 2021.  He was sentenced to serve five (5) years for the crime of Burglary-Vehicle in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released on February 6, 2025.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.